Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2332.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 32, chapter 32, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 32-3230.03, to read: START_STATUTE32-3230.03. Medical interventions; messenger ribonucleic acid technology; prohibition; definitions A. It is an act of unprofessional conduct for a health professional to provide a medical intervention that includes messenger ribonucleic acid technology. B. For the purposes of this section: 1. "Domestic animal" has the same meaning prescribed in section 12-558.02. 2. "Medical intervention" means a medical procedure, treatment, device, drug, injection, medication or medical action taken to diagnose, prevent or cure a disease or alter the health or biological function of a person or domestic animal. END_STATUTE